Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1501
Executions; by whom issued; how directed.

Executions shall be deemed process of the court, and shall be issued by the clerk and directed to the sheriff of the county. They may be directed to different counties at the same time.

R.S.1867, Code § 474, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 8042;

C.S.1922, § 8983;

C.S.1929, § 20-1501;

R.S.1943, § 25-1501.

Execution against partnership or unincorporated associations, see section 25-316.

Divorce decree which provides for child's support is subject to the power of the district court over all its decrees and processes. Wassung v. Wassung, 136 Neb. 440, 286 N.W. 340 (1939).

No second order of sale shall issue against property sold under previous order, where first sale is confirmed. Storey v. Miles, 86 Neb. 827, 126 N.W. 517 (1910).

Execution issued without seal is void. Taylor v. Courtnay, 15 Neb. 190, 16 N.W. 842 (1883).

Execution cannot issue after supersedeas bond is filed. State Bank of Nebraska v. Green, 8 Neb. 297, 1 N.W. 210 (1879).